District of Columbia statutes.
31-5041.11

Rules.

The Commissioner, through the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2132, 57 DCR 6242

History

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2132 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Emergency Legislation